Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 3. Other Privileges.

Sec. 09.25.400.
Privilege relating to domestic violence and sexual assault counseling.

Confidential communications between a victim of domestic violence or sexual assault and a victim counselor are privileged under AS

18.66.200

—

18.66.250

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.25.230

. Renumbered in 1994.

In 1996, “AS

18.66.200

—

18.66.250

” was substituted for “AS

25.35.100

— 25.35.150” to reflect the 1996 renumbering of AS

25.35.100

— 25.35.150.